Maryland, session 2026, HB1193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1016.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ASSESS AND COLLECT AN 8% HOTEL RENTAL SURCHARGE ON
RENTAL UNITS ON THE PROPERTY OF SAVAGE HIGHLANDS STATE PARK; AND
(2) REMIT THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SURCHARGE TO THE
COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO GARRETT COUNTY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1193*

HOUSE BILL 1193
(B) (1) FROM THE PART OF THE SURCHARGE COLLECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A RATE OF 6%,
GARRETT COUNTY SHALL DESIGNATE A PORTION FOR THE PROMOTION OF THE
COUNTY.
(2) THE PART OF THE SURCHARGE COLLECTED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE RATE GREATER THAN 6%
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.